Massachusetts, session 194th, S1616.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. (a) There shall be an advisory committee to examine the accessibility of 
fresh food retail in communities throughout the commonwealth. The advisory committee shall: 
(i) develop criteria to determine which communities lack adequate access to fresh food retail, 
particularly urban and rural communities; (ii) investigate the causes of inadequate access to fresh 
food retail; (iii) study the public health impact of inadequate access to fresh food retail; (iv) 
develop innovative strategies and recommendations to increase access to fresh food retail, 
including: legislation, economic incentives and financing options, improvements to 
transportation, public-private partnerships, pilot programs and the improvement of food 
programs already in existence; and (v) calculate the costs and potential savings of all strategies 
and recommendations and determine the benefits, drawbacks and feasibility of all strategies and 
recommendations.  

of 2 12  (b) The advisory committee shall consist of: (i) the commissioner of public health, or a 
designee, who shall serve as chair of the advisory committee; (ii) the secretary of housing and 
economic development, or a designee; (iii) the commissioner of agricultural resources, or a 
designee; (iv) the chairs of the joint committee on public health; (v) a nutritionist appointed by 
the commissioner of public health; and (vi) 5 members to be appointed by the governor, 1 of 
whom shall be a representative of the supermarket industry, 1 of whom shall be a representative 
of farmers markets, 1 of whom shall be a representative of the gateway cities, 1 of whom shall be 
a representative of nonprofit and not-for-profit hunger relief organizations and 1 of whom shall 
be a representative of the Massachusetts Public Health Association.  
(c) The advisory committee shall commence no later than 90 days after the effective date 
of this act.  
(d) The advisory committee shall file a report with its findings, recommendations and 
draft legislation to the senate and house committees on ways and means, the chairs of the joint 
committee on community development and small business, the chairs of the joint committee on 
public health and the chairs of the joint committee on children, families and persons with 
disabilities no later than 18 months after enactment of this section.  
SECTION 2. The advisory committee shall expire upon submission of the report pursuant 
to subsection (d) of section 1.